Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8 of Title 72, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. All honorably discharged veterans who are currently Oklahoma
residents shall be allowed free admission to all sporting events
hosted by a public school. A valid Oklahoma driver license or state
photo identification card and military discharge papers (DD Form
214) or similar evidence of an honorable discharge from the United
States Armed Forces are required for free admission.
B. A valid Oklahoma driver license or identification card
issued by the Department of Public Safety with a flag emblem and the
word "veteran" in the upper left-hand corner of the front of the

Req. No. 13889 Page 1

driv er license or identification card shall be sufficient for free
admission to all public school hosted sporting events.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-13889 TKR 11/19/25



















Req. No. 13889 Page 2